Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.70.020

Regulating assisted living facilities.

A code city may exercise the powers relating to enforcement of regulations for assisted living facilities.

[ 2012 c 10 s 40; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.70.020.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.